Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3307
Direct supervision, defined.

Direct supervision means that the supervisor is on the premises and is available to the veterinary technician or unlicensed assistant who is treating the animal and the animal has been examined by a veterinarian at such times as acceptable veterinary practice requires consistent with the particular delegated animal health care task.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1089.